Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 30. Advisory Council on Career and Technical Education.

§§ 30-198 through 30-200.1.

Expired.

Editor’s note.

This chapter was enacted by Acts 2002, c. 526, and amended by Acts 2004, cc. 989, 1000; 2007, c. 401, and expired July 1, 2012, pursuant to the provisions of former § 30-200.1.

Former § 30-198 was also amended by Acts 2012, cc. 803, 835, cl. 99.